District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-601

Production and shipment of products to conform to local standards.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 27, 1925, 43 Stat. 1004, ch. 358, § 1
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1937, Pub. L. 91-650, title VI, § 601(a)
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(b), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-301.
1973 Ed., § 33-301.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 48-601 to 48-610, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).